src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SG-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Com+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етге K ;

LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етлӓ K ;
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG2_BACK
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/CP:%>лаэт K ;
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG2_FRONT
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/CP:%>лӓэт K ;

LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етлӓн K ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹн K ;

LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹшкӹ K ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹш   K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG2_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ышкет K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG2_FRONT
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ӹшкет K ;

LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG2_BACK
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ыштет K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG2_FRONT
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ӹштет K ;

LEXICON SG-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ешет K ;
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹш K ;

LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ет K ;

LEXICON PL-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтде K ;
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓде K ;

LEXICON PL-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓм  K ;
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтӹм K ;

LEXICON PL-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓге K ;
 +Pl+Com+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтге K ;

LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтлӓ K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓэт K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓлӓ K ;

LEXICON PL-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓнет K ;
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓлӓ  K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ Is this really supposed to be here

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓн  K ;
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg2+So/NPC:%>влӓэтӹн K ;

LEXICON PL-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓшкет  K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓшкӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓш   K ;

LEXICON PL-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓштет  K ;
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓштӹ K ;

LEXICON PL-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Lat+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓэшет K ;
! +Pl+Lat+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓэш K ;
  +Pl+Lat+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓэш K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC:%>етвлӓ   K ;
  +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP:%>влӓэт   K ;

!! PXSG3
!LEXICON PXSG3-SG-ABE
! +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/CP:%>де%>ж%{ыӹ%} K ;
! +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%{ыӹ%}%>де K ;

LEXICON SG-ABE-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/CP:%>де%>жӹ K ;
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>де K ;

LEXICON SG-ABE-PXSG3_FRONT
  +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/CP:%>де%>жӹ K ;
  +Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>де K ;

!LEXICON PXSG3-SG-ACC
! +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%{ыӹ%}%>м K ;

LEXICON SG-ACC-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>м K ;

LEXICON SG-ACC-PXSG3_FRONT
  +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>м   K ;

!LEXICON PXSG3-SG-COM
! +Sg+Com+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%{ыӹ%}%>ге K ;

LEXICON SG-COM-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Com+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>ге K ;

LEXICON SG-COM-PXSG3_FRONT
   +Sg+Com+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>ге       K ;

!LEXICON PXSG3-SG-CMPR
! +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}%>ж%{ыӹ%} K ;
! +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%{ыӹ%}%>л%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ла%>жы K ;
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>ла K ;

LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG3_FRONT
  +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/CP:%>лӓ%>жӹ        K ;
  +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>лӓ        K ;

!LEXICON PXSG3-SG-DAT
!  +Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ж%{ыӹ%}%>л%{аӓ%}н K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>лан K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>лӓн K ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>н K ;
LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>н K ;

LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ышкы%>жы K ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>шкы  K ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>ш    K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ӹшкӹ%>жӹ K ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>шкӹ  K ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>ш    K ;

LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG3_BACK
        +Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ышты%>жы K ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ышты%>ш  K ;
        +Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жы%>шты  K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG3_FRONT
        +Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ%>жӹ K ;
 +Use/NG+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ%>ш  K ;
        +Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹ%>штӹ  K ;

LEXICON SG-LAT-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ешӹжӹ K ;
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жыш   K ;
LEXICON SG-LAT-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ешӹжӹ K ;
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>жӹш   K ;

LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG3_BACK
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/CP:%>жы K ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/CP:%>жӹ K ;

LEXICON PL-ABE-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹде K ;
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓде K ;
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓде K ;

LEXICON PL-ACC-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹм K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓм K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓм K ;

LEXICON PL-COM-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹге K ;
LEXICON PL-COM-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Com+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓге K ;
LEXICON PL-COM-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Com+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓге K ;

LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹлӓ K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓжӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓлӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓлӓ K ;

LEXICON PL-DAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹлӓн K ;
 +Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓнжӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-DAT-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓлӓн K ;
LEXICON PL-DAT-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓлӓн K ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹн K ;
LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓн K ;
LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓн K ;

LEXICON PL-ILL-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓшкӹжӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹш   K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹшкӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓшкӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓш   K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓшкӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓш   K ;

LEXICON PL-INE-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/NPC:%>влӓжӹштӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓштӹжӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-INE-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-INE-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓштӹ K ;

LEXICON PL-LAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓэшӹжӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-LAT-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓэш K ;
LEXICON PL-LAT-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓэш K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/NCP:%>влӓжӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG3_BACK
 +Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жы%>влӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG3_FRONT
 +Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/PNC:%>жӹ%>влӓ K ;

!+!



LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ABE
 +Sg+Abe+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>де K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ACC
 +Sg+Acc+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-COM
 +Sg+Com+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>ге K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-CMPR
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}%>н%{аӓ%} K ;
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>л%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-DAT
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>л%{аӓ%}н K ;
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl1+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}н%>н%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-GEN
  +Sg+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:%>н%{аӓ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}н         K ;

!LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ILL
! +Sg+Ill+PxPl1+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%}%>н%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL1_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ышкы%>на K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL1_FRONT
  +Sg+Ill+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ӹшкӹ%>нӓ                  K ;
!LEXICON PXPL1-SG-INE
! +Sg+Ine+PxPl1+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>н%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL1_BACK
 +Sg+Ine+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ышты%>на K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL1_FRONT
 +Sg+Ine+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ%>нӓ K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-LAT
 +Sg+Lat+PxPl1+So/CP:%>еш%>н%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-NOM
 +Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/CP:%>н%{аӓ%} K ;

!+!
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓнӓде K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓнӓм K ;
LEXICON PL-COM-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓнӓге K ;
LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓнӓлӓ K ;

LEXICON PL-DAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Dat+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓнӓлӓн K ;
 +Pl+Dat+PxPl1+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓннӓ K ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxPl1+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>нӓ%>ӹн K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ill+PxPl1+So/NCP:%>влӓшкӹнӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-INE-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ine+PxPl1+So/NCP:%>влӓштӹнӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-LAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Lat+PxPl1+So/NCP:%>влӓэшнӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Nom+PxPl1+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>нӓ K ;

!!PxPl2
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ABE
 +Sg+Abe+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>де K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ACC
 +Sg+Acc+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-COM
 +Sg+Com+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>ге K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-CMPR
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}%>д%{аӓ%} K ;
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>л%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-DAT
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>л%{аӓ%}н K ;
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl2+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}н%>д%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-GEN
  +Sg+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:%>д%{аӓ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}н         K ;
!LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ILL
! +Sg+Ill+PxPl2+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%}%>д%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL2_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ышкы%>да K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL2_FRONT
  +Sg+Ill+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ӹшкӹ%>дӓ                  K ;
!LEXICON PXPL2-SG-INE
! +Sg+Ine+PxPl2+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>д%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL2_BACK
 +Sg+Ine+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ышты%>да K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL2_FRONT
 +Sg+Ine+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-LAT
 +Sg+Lat+PxPl2+So/CP:%>еш%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL2
 +Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/CP:%>д%{аӓ%} K ;

!+!
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXPL2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>де K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC-PXPL2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>ӹм K ;
LEXICON PL-COM-PXPL2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>ге K ;
LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXPL2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>лӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-DAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Dat+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓлӓн   K ;
  +Pl+Dat+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>лӓндӓ   K ;
! +Pl+Dat+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>лӓн K ;
! +Pl+Dat+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>лӓн%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL2_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxPl2+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>дӓ%>ӹн K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL-PXPL2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Ill+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>шкӹдӓ    K ;
! +Pl+Ill+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>ӹшкӹ%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-INE-PXPL2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Ine+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>штӹдӓ    K ;
! +Pl+Ine+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-LAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Lat+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓэшдӓ      K ;
! +Pl+Lat+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>Е2ш%>дӓ K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL2_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Nom+PxPl2+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>дӓ              K ;

!!PxPl3
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ABE
! +Sg+Abe+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>де K ;
LEXICON SG-ABE-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Abe+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>де K ;
LEXICON SG-ABE-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Abe+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>де                   K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ACC
! +Sg+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ;
LEXICON SG-ACC-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>ым K ;
LEXICON SG-ACC-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Acc+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>ӹм             K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-COM
! +Sg+Com+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>ге K ;
LEXICON SG-COM-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Com+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>ге K ;
LEXICON SG-COM-PXPL3_FRONT
   +Sg+Com+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>ге                  K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-CMPR
! +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>л%{аӓ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>ла K ;
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ла%>ышты K ;
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>лӓ                   K ;
  +Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/CP:%>лӓ%>ӹштӹ                   K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-DAT
!  +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>л%{аӓ%}н K ;
!  +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/CP:%>л%{аӓ%}н%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>лан K ;
 +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/CP:%>лан%>ышты K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>лӓн                  K ;
  +Sg+Dat+PxPl3+So/CP:%>лӓн%>ӹштӹ                  K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-GEN
! +Sg+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}н K ;
LEXICON SG-GEN-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ышты%>ын K ;
LEXICON SG-GEN-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ӹштӹ%>ӹн                           K ;
